Maine, session 132, LD909.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. B, §1 and
affected by §7, is further amended to read:
C. The estates up to the just value of $6,000 $5,000, having a taxable situs in the place
of residence, of veterans who served in the Armed Forces of the United States:; except
that, for veterans who are 62 years of age or older, the exemption is up to $6,000 of the
just value.
(1) During any federally recognized war period, including the Korean Conflict,
the Vietnam War, the Persian Gulf War, the periods from August 24, 1982 to July
31, 1984 and December 20, 1989 to January 31, 1990, Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn, or during the period
from February 1, 1955 to February 27, 1961, or who were awarded an
expeditionary medal for service in the Armed Forces of the United States, when
they have reached the age of 62 years or when they are receiving any form of
pension or compensation from the United States Government for total disability,
service-connected or nonservice-connected, as a veteran. A veteran of the Vietnam
War must have served on active duty after February 27, 1961 and before May 8,
1975. "Persian Gulf War" means service on active duty on or after August 2, 1990
and before or on the date that the United States Government recognizes as the end
of that war period; or
(2) Who are disabled by injury or disease incurred or aggravated during active
military service in the line of duty and are receiving any form of pension or
compensation from the United States Government for total, service-connected
disability.
The exemptions provided in this paragraph apply to the property of that veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C-1, as amended by PL 1995, c. 368, Pt. CCC,
§2 and affected by §11, is further amended to read:
C-1. The estates up to the just value of $7,000, having a taxable situs in the place of
residence of veterans who served in the Armed Forces of the United States during any
federally recognized war period during or before World War I and who would be
eligible for an exemption under paragraph C.
The exemption provided in this paragraph is in lieu of any exemption under paragraph
C to which the veteran may be eligible and applies to the property of that veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶C-2 is enacted to read:
C-2. The estates, having a taxable situs in the place of residence of veterans who served
in the Armed Forces of the United States and have a service-connected disability rating
as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs of 60% or greater,
as follows.
Page 1 - 132LR2358(01)

(1) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 100%, the exemption
is up to $50,000 of the just value.
(2) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 90%, the exemption
is up to $40,000 of the just value.
(3) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 80%, the exemption
is up to $30,000 of the just value.
(4) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 70%, the exemption
is up to $20,000 of the just value.
(5) For a veteran with a service-connected disability rating of 60%, the exemption
is up to $10,000 of the just value.
The exemptions provided in this paragraph apply to the property of that veteran,
including property held in joint tenancy with that veteran's spouse or held in a revocable
living trust for the benefit of that veteran.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D, as amended by PL 2007, c. 240, Pt. PPPP,
§2, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. B, §2
and affected by §7, is further amended to read:
D-1. The estates up to the just value of $50,000, having a taxable situs in the place of
residence, for specially adapted housing units, of veterans who served in the Armed
Forces of the United States during any federally recognized war period, including the
Korean Conflict, the Vietnam War, the Persian Gulf War, the periods from August 24,
1982 to July 31, 1984 and December 20, 1989 to January 31, 1990, Operation Enduring
Freedom, Operation Iraqi Freedom and Operation New Dawn, or during the period
from February 1, 1955 to February 27, 1961, or who were awarded an expeditionary
medal for service in the Armed Forces of the United States, and who are veterans as
described in 38 United States Code, Section 2101, and who received a grant from the
United States Government for any such housing, or of the unremarried widows or
widowers of those veterans. A veteran of the Vietnam War must have served on active
duty after February 27, 1961 and before May 8, 1975. "Persian Gulf War" means
service on active duty on or after August 2, 1990 and before or on the date that the
United States Government recognizes as the end of that war period. The exemption
provided in this paragraph applies to the property of the veteran including property
held in joint tenancy with a spouse or held in a revocable living trust for the benefit of
that veteran.
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-2, as amended by PL 2003, c. 702, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 7. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶D-3, as amended by PL 2003, c. 702, §4, is
repealed.
Sec. 8. 36 MRSA §653, sub-§1, ¶E, as amended by PL 2023, c. 360, Pt. A, §7, is
further amended to read:
E. The word "veteran" as used in this subsection For purposes of this section, "veteran"
means an individual who was on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States
Page 2 - 132LR2358(01)

413 and who, if discharged, retired or separated from the Armed Forces, was discharged,
424 retired or separated under other than dishonorable conditions. "Veteran" also includes:
(1) The unremarried surviving spouse or minor child of a veteran who would be
entitled to an exemption under this section if living, or who is in receipt of a
pension or compensation from the Federal Government as the surviving spouse or
minor child of a veteran; and
(2) The parent of a deceased veteran who is 62 years of age or older and is an
unremarried surviving spouse who is in receipt of a pension or compensation from
the Federal Government based upon the service-connected death of that parent's
child.
Individuals seeking an exemption as the unremarried surviving spouse, minor child or
parent of a veteran as described in subparagraphs (1) and (2) are eligible for the
exemption that the veteran would be eligible for pursuant to this section if the veteran
was living.
Sec. 9. 36 MRSA §841, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 367, §8, is further
amended to read:
4. Veteran's widow or widower surviving spouse or minor child. Notwithstanding
failure to comply with section 706‑A, the assessors, on written application within one year
from the date of commitment, may make such abatement as they think proper in the case
of the unremarried widow or widower surviving spouse or the minor child of a veteran, if
the widow, widower surviving spouse or child would be entitled to an exemption under
section 653, subsection 1, paragraph D E, except for the failure of the widow, widower
surviving spouse or child to make application and file proof within the time set by section
653, subsection 1, paragraph G, if the veteran died during the 12-month period preceding
the April 1st for which the tax was committed.
Sec. 10. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.